Nevada, session 2025Special36, SB10.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 111 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 1.5 to 4, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 1.5. The Legislature finds and declares that:
1. The State of Nevada has a compelling interest in:
(a) Promoting housing attainability for all of its residents;
(b) Stabilizing neighborhoods adversely affected by high-
vacancy rates, foreclosure, blight or other signs of economic
distress; and
(c) Supporting state or local housing programs designed to
enhance community revitalization efforts;
2. Ensuring a fair and competitive housing market is
necessary to provide opportunities for individual homeownership
and to prevent distortions in the housing market;
3. Preserving the stability and character of the State’s
communities is essential to the welfare and prosperity of the
residents of this State; and
4. Reducing speculative investment in residential real estate
by large institutional buyers is necessary to further these public
interests and to prevent housing shortages and undue increases in
housing costs.
Sec. 2. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2:
(a) The total aggregate number of units of residential real
property in this State that may be purchased in any 1 calendar
year by corporations, foreign corporations, multinational
corporations, pooled investment vehicles, limited-liability
companies and affiliates of such entities must not exceed 1,000
units.
(b) A corporation, foreign corporation, multinational
corporation, pooled investment vehicle, limited-liability company
-
*SB10_R1*

– 4 –
or an affiliate of such an entity shall not purchase any unit of
residential real property in this State if, as a result of the purchase,
the total aggregate number of units of residential real property
purchased in this State during the current calendar year by
corporations, foreign corporations, multinational corporations,
pooled investment vehicles, limited-liability companies and
affiliates of such entities would exceed 1,000 units.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to:
(a) The intracorporate sale or transfer of units of residential
real property;
(b) The sale of newly constructed units of residential real
property;
(c) The sale of a mobile home or manufactured home;
(d) The sale of an apartment building;
(e) The sale of residential real property by a state or federally
chartered credit union, any credit union service organization
owned by such a credit union, or any wholly-owned entity of such
a credit union provided that the acquisition or holding of the unit
of residential real property is consistent with its charter and
bylaws; or
(f) The sale of an existing unit of residential real property that
the Administrator of the Housing Division of the Department of
Business and Industry determines to be in the public interest.
3. The Securities Division of the Office of the Secretary of
State shall create and maintain:
(a) A registry of corporations, foreign corporations,
multinational corporations, pooled investment vehicles, limited-
liability companies and affiliates of such entities that purchase or
own residential real property in this State. The Securities Division
shall make the registry available on the Internet website of the
Office of the Secretary of State.
(b) A database that tracks the aggregate number of units of
residential real property purchased annually by corporations,
foreign corporations, multinational corporations, pooled
investment vehicles, limited-liability companies and affiliates of
such entities.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a
corporation, foreign corporation, multinational corporation,
pooled investment vehicle, limited-liability company or an affiliate
of such an entity must register with the Securities Division of the
Office of the Secretary of State before the entity purchases any
unit of residential real property in this State. The requirement to
register does not apply to a corporation, foreign corporation,
multinational corporation, pooled investment vehicle, limited-
-
*SB10_R1*

– 5 –
liability company or an affiliate of such an entity that owns fewer
than 15 units of residential real property in this State.
5. Each corporation, foreign corporation, multinational
corporation, pooled investment vehicle, limited-liability company
or affiliate of such an entity shall report to the Secretary of State
not later than 10 business days after the completion of each
purchase of a unit of residential real property in this State. The
report must include, without limitation, the address, date of
purchase and the purchase price of the unit of residential real
property. Upon receipt of the report, the Secretary of State shall
immediately update the database created by subsection 3 and
reduce the available annual allotment.
6. The Secretary of State shall provide periodic reports to
each county recorder or his or her designee, detailing each
purchases of a unit of residential real property by a corporation,
foreign corporation, multinational corporation, pooled investment
vehicle, limited-liability company or an affiliate of such an entity
to ensure compliance with the provisions of subsections 7, 8 and 9
of NRS 111.312, as applicable.
7. The Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of
registration to each corporation, foreign corporation,
multinational corporation, pooled investment vehicle, limited-
liability company or affiliate of such an entity that registers
pursuant to this section.
8. The Secretary of State may establish reasonable fees
necessary for the administration of this section. The Secretary of
State shall remit seventy-five percent of any fees collected
pursuant to this section to the State General Fund.
9. The Secretary of State shall adopt any regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
10. As used in this section:
(a) “Affiliate” means any entity that directly or indirectly
controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with a
corporation, foreign corporation, multinational corporation,
pooled investment vehicle, or limited liability company, including
any entity sharing common ownership with or acting as a parent
or subsidiary of such corporation, foreign corporation,
multinational corporation, pooled investment vehicle or limited
liability company.
(b) “Corporation” does not include:
(1) A family trust company, as defined in NRS 669.042.
(2) A housing authority, as defined in NRS 315.021.
(c) “Limited-liability company” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 86.061.
-
*SB10_R1*

– 6 –
(d) “Manufactured home” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 489.113.
(e) “Mobile home” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 489.120.
Sec. 2.5. 1. Any purchase of a unit of residential real
property in violation of subsection 1 of section 2 of this act is void
and conveys no legal title to the purchaser.
2. If a deed for a transaction made in violation of section 2 of
this act is recorded, that deed is subject to nullification through
appropriate legal action.
3. The Secretary of State may investigate any potential
violation of section 2 of this act and disclose any information or
evidence concerning a potential violation to the Attorney General.
4. The Attorney General may initiate legal proceedings to
enforce the provisions of this section including, without limitation,
obtaining a court order to nullify the deed.
5. The remedy provided in this subsection is in addition to
any other remedy at law or in equity.
Sec. 3. 1. The Attorney General, upon the request of the
Secretary of State, may bring an action in any court of competent
jurisdiction against an entity that violates or proposes to violate
the provisions of section 2 of this act to obtain an injunction or
other equitable relief appropriate to ensure compliance with or
enforce the provisions of section 2 of this act.
2. The provisions of this section do not abrogate or limit the
right of any person to bring any civil action pursuant to any other
statute or the common law.
Sec. 4. The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations
establishing requirements for the form and contents of any
instrument that creates a life estate.
Sec. 5. NRS 111.312 is hereby amended to read as follows:
111.312 1. The county recorder shall not record with respect
to real property, a notice of completion, a declaration of homestead,
a restrictive covenant modification form, a restrictive covenant
modification document, a lien or notice of lien, an affidavit of death,
a mortgage or deed of trust, any conveyance of real property or
instrument in writing setting forth an agreement to convey real
property or a notice pursuant to NRS 111.3655 unless the document
being recorded contains:
(a) The mailing address of the grantee or, if there is no grantee,
the mailing address of the person who is requesting the recording of
the document; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the assessor’s
parcel number of the property at the top left corner of the first page
of the document, if the county assessor has assigned a parcel
-
*SB10_R1*

– 7 –
number to the property. The parcel number must comply with the
current system for numbering parcels used by the county assessor’s
office. The county recorder is not required to verify that the
assessor’s parcel number is correct.
2. Any document relating exclusively to the transfer of water
rights may be recorded without containing the assessor’s parcel
number of the property.
3. The county recorder shall not record with respect to real
property any deed, including, without limitation:
(a) A grant, bargain and sale deed;
(b) Quitclaim deed;
(c) Warranty deed; or
(d) Trustee’s deed upon sale,
 unless the document being recorded contains the name and
address of the person to whom a statement of the taxes assessed on
the real property is to be mailed.
4. The assessor’s parcel number shall not be deemed to be a
complete legal description of the real property conveyed.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, if a document
that is being recorded includes a legal description of real property
that is provided in metes and bounds, the document must include the
name and mailing address of the person who prepared the legal
description. The county recorder is not required to verify the
accuracy of the name and mailing address of such a person.
6. If a document including the same legal description described
in subsection 5 previously has been recorded, the document must
include all information necessary to identify and locate the previous
recording, but the name and mailing address of the person who
prepared the legal description is not required for the document to be
recorded. The county recorder is not required to verify the accuracy
of the information concerning the previous recording.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 10, if a
corporation, foreign corporation, multinational corporation,
pooled investment vehicle, limited-liability company or affiliate of
such an entity purchases a unit of residential real property, the
county recorder shall not record the deed unless the corporation,
foreign corporation, multinational corporation, pooled investment
vehicle, limited-liability company or affiliate of such an entity
submits to the county recorder for recording, concurrently with
the deed to be recorded, a copy of the certificate of registration
issued by the Secretary of State pursuant to section 2 of this act for
that purchase and the name of the corporation, foreign
corporation, multinational corporation, pooled investment vehicle,
limited-liability company or affiliate of such an entity on the deed
-
*SB10_R1*

– 8 –
matches the name on the certificate of registration accompanying
the deed.
8. If a document is an instrument that creates a life estate, the
county recorder shall not record the document unless the
document satisfies the requirements established by the Secretary
of State pursuant to section 4 of this act.
9. The county recorder shall provide to the Secretary of State,
upon request, any information collected by the county recorder
relating to the provisions of subsection 7 that the Secretary of
State deems necessary to determine whether the purchase of a unit
of residential real property by a corporation, foreign corporation,
multinational corporation, pooled investment vehicle, limited-
liability company or affiliate of such an entity complies with the
provisions of section 2 of this act and the regulations adopted
pursuant thereto.
10. The provisions of subsection 7 do not apply to a
corporation, foreign corporation, multinational corporation,
pooled investment vehicle, limited-liability company or affiliate of
such an entity that owns fewer than 15 units of residential real
property in this State.
11. As used in this section, the terms “corporation” and
“limited-liability company” have the meanings ascribed to them in
section 2 of this act.
Sec. 5.5. This act does not apply to the purchase of a unit of
residential real property completed on or before July 1, 2026.
Sec. 5.7. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 218D.430
and 218D.435, a committee may vote on this act before the
expiration of the period prescribed for the return of a fiscal note in
NRS 218D.475. This section applies retroactively from and after
November 13, 2025.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective:
1. Upon passage and approval for the purposes of adopting
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
2. On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB10_R1*